Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 2
S

HORE PROTECTION

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 1992, p. 1362,

§

1, effective July 1, 1992, repealed the Code sections formerly codified as this part and enacted the current part. The former part, relating to shoreline management, was based on Ga. L. 1979, p. 1636,

§§

1-17 and Ga. L. 1984, p. 404,

§

4.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Shore protection, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-2-2.

Law reviews.

-
For article surveying recent legislative and judicial developments in zoning, planning and environmental law, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 89 (1979). For survey article on environment, natural resources, and land use, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 145 (1982). For article, "Hazardous Waste Issues in Real Estate Transactions," see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 581 (1987). For annual survey on local government law, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 135 (2014). For annual survey on administrative law, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2014).
For note discussing the historical aspects and current law concerning the state's ownership rights in tidelands, see 17 Ga. L. Rev. 851 (1983). For note on the 1992 enactment of this part, see 9 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 205 (1992).

12-5-230. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the "Shore Protection Act."

(Code 1981, §

12-5-230

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1362, § 1.)

Law reviews.

-
For annual survey on local government law, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 135 (2014).

12-5-231. Legislative findings and declarations.

The General Assembly finds and declares that coastal sand dunes, beaches, sandbars, and shoals comprise a vital natural resource system, known as the sand-sharing system, which acts as a buffer to protect real and personal property and natural resources from the damaging effects of floods, winds, tides, and erosion. It is recognized that the coastal sand dunes are the most inland portion of the sand-sharing system and that because the dunes are the fragile product of shoreline evolution, they are easily disturbed by actions harming their vegetation or inhibiting their natural development. The General Assembly further finds that offshore sandbars and shoals are the system's first line of defense against the potentially destructive energy generated by winds, tides, and storms, and help to protect the onshore segment of the system by acting as reservoirs of sand for the beaches. Removal of sand from these bars and shoals can interrupt natural sand flows and can have unintended, undesirable, and irreparable effects on the entire sand-sharing system, particularly when the historical patterns of sand and water flows are not considered and accommodated. Also, it is found that ocean beaches provide an unparalleled natural recreation resource which has become vitally linked to the economy of Georgia's coastal zone and to that of the entire state. The General Assembly further finds that this natural resource system is costly, if not impossible, to reconstruct or rehabilitate once adversely affected by man related activities and is important to conserve for the present and future use and enjoyment of all citizens and visitors to this state and that the sand-sharing system is an integral part of Georgia's barrier islands, providing great protection to the state's marshlands and estuaries. The General Assembly further finds that this sand-sharing system is a vital area of the state and is essential to maintain the health, safety, and welfare of all the citizens of the state. Therefore, the General Assembly declares that the management of the sand-sharing system has more than local significance, is of equal importance to all citizens of the state, is of state-wide concern, and consequently is properly a matter for regulation under the police power of the state. The General Assembly further finds and declares that activities and structures on offshore sandbars and shoals, for all purposes except federal navigational activities, must be regulated to ensure that the values and functions of the sand-sharing system are not impaired. It is declared to be a policy of this state and the intent of this part to protect this vital natural resource system by allowing only activities and alterations of the sand dunes and beaches which are considered to be in the best interest of the state and which do not substantially impair the values and functions of the sand-sharing system and by authorizing the local units of government of the State of Georgia to regulate activities and alterations of the ocean sand dunes and beaches and recognizing that, if the local units of government fail to carry out the policies expressed in this part, it is essential that the department undertake such regulation.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-231

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1362, § 1.)

Cross references.

- Control of soil erosion and sedimentation by means of regulation of clearing, dredging, grading of land, T. 12, C. 7.

Law reviews.

-
For note discussing the historical aspects and current law concerning the state's ownership rights in tidelands, see 17 Ga. L. Rev. 851 (1983).

12-5-232. Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

"Applicant" means any person who files an application for a permit under this part.

"Bare sand surface" means an area of nearly level unconsolidated sand landward of the ordinary high-water mark which does not contain sufficient indigenous vegetation to maintain its stability.

"Barrier islands" means the following islands: Daufuskie, Tybee, Little Tybee, Petit Chou, Williamson, Wassaw, Ossabaw, St. Catherines, Blackbeard, Sapelo, Cabretta, Wolf, Egg, Little St. Simons, Sea, St. Simons, Jekyll, Little Cumberland, Cumberland, Amelia, and any ocean-facing island which is formed in the future and which has multiple ridges of sand, gravel, or mud built on the seashore by waves and currents; ridges generally parallel to the shore; and areas of vegetation.

"Beach" means a zone of unconsolidated material that extends landward from the ordinary low-water mark to the line of permanent vegetation.

"Board" means the Board of Natural Resources.

"Boardwalk" or "crosswalk" means a nonhabitable structure, usually made of wood and without a paved or poured surface of any kind, whose primary purpose is to provide access to or use of the beach, while maintaining the stability of any sand dunes it traverses.

(6.1) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of natural resources.

"Committee" means the Shore Protection Committee.

"Dynamic dune field" means those elements of the sand-sharing system including the dynamic area of beach and sand dunes, varying in height and width, but does not include stable sand dunes. The ocean boundary of the dynamic dune field extends to the ordinary high-water mark as determined by the department. The landward boundary of the dynamic dune field, as determined by the department, shall be the first occurrence of either the seaward most portion of a structure existing on July 1, 1979, or the landward most line that is 25 feet landward of the landward toe of the most landward sand dune, or 25 feet landward of the crest of a serviceable shoreline stabilization activity. In the absence of any of the aforesaid, the line shall be 25 feet landward of the ordinary high-water mark, except for property owned by the state, in which case the line shall be 100 feet landward of the ordinary high-water mark. If a real estate appraiser certified pursuant to Chapter 39A of Title 43 determines that an existing structure, shoreline engineering activity, or other alteration which forms part of the landward boundary of the dynamic dune field has been more than 80 percent destroyed by storm driven water or erosion, the landward boundary of the dynamic dune field shall be determined as though such structure had not been in existence on July 1, 1979.

"Erosion" means the wearing away of land whereby materials are removed from the sand dunes, beaches, and shore face by natural processes, including, but not limited to, wave action, tidal currents, littoral currents, and wind.

(9.1) "Letter of permission" means written authorization from the department to conduct a proposed activity in an area subject to the jurisdiction of this part, provided such activity is either within the physical perimeter of an existing serviceable project or involves the construction and removal of a project or other temporary activity that concludes within six months, inclusive of the time needed to return all affected areas to a condition approximate to, or better than, that which existed before commencement of the activity.

"Local unit of government" means a county, as defined by Code Section 36-1-1, or an incorporated municipality, as defined by Code Section 36-40-21, or any combination thereof which has been authorized by an Act of the General Assembly, any of which has within its jurisdiction any sand dune or beach.

(10.1) "Minor activity" means an activity such as the construction or installation of decks, patios, or porches or the alteration of native landscaping, so long as such construction, installation, or alteration, when combined with other structures on the subject parcel or portion thereof, does not impact more than a total of one-third of the subject parcel or portion thereof that is subject to the jurisdiction of this part; or the construction or installation of elevated crosswalks providing access across sand dunes and shoreline stabilization activities.

"Ordinary high-water mark" means the upper reach of the tide along the shore established by the fluctuations of water and indicated by physical characteristics such as a clear natural line impressed on the shore, shelving, changes in the character of soil, or the presence of litter and debris, as determined by the department.

"Ordinary low-water mark" means the position along the shore of the mean monthly spring low tide reached during the most recent tidal epoch. This term is not synonymous with "mean" low-water mark.

Reserved.

"Person" means any association, individual, partnership, corporation, public or private authority, or local unit of government, and shall include the State of Georgia and all its departments, boards, bureaus, commissions, authorities, any other government agencies or instrumentalities, and any other legal entity.

"Sand dunes" means mounds of sand within the sand-sharing system deposited along a coastline by wind, tidal, or wave action, or by beach nourishment or dune construction, which mounds are often covered with sparse, pioneer vegetation, such as, but not limited to, sea oats (Uniola paniculate), beach morning glory (Ipomoea pes-caprae), and large salt meadow cordgrass (Spartina patens), and are located landward of the ordinary high-water mark and may extend into the tree line.

"Sand-sharing system" means an interdependent sediment system composed of sand dunes, beaches, and offshore bars and shoals.

(16.1) "Serviceable" means usable as is or with only minor maintenance, but not so degraded as to essentially require reconstruction, as determined by the department.

"Shoreline engineering activity" means an activity which encompasses any artificial method of altering the natural topography or vegetation of the sand dunes, beaches, bars, submerged shoreline lands, and other components of the sand-sharing system. This includes, but is not limited to, such activities as:

Grading, clearing vegetation, excavating earth, or landscaping, where such activities are for purposes other than erection of a structure;

Artificial dune construction;

Beach restoration or renourishment;

Erosion control activities, including, but not limited to, the construction and maintenance of groins and jetties;

Shoreline stabilization activities, including, but not limited to, the construction and maintenance of seawalls and riprap protection; and

The construction and maintenance of pipelines and piers.

"Stable sand dune" means a sand dune not in the sand-sharing system that is maintained in a steady state of neither erosion nor accretion by indigenous woody vegetative cover such as, but not limited to, pines (Pinus), oaks (Quercus), and wax myrtles (Morella cerifera).

"Structure" means an institutional, residential, commercial, or industrial building.

"Submerged shoreline lands" means the intertidal and submerged lands from the ordinary high-water mark seaward to the limit of the state's jurisdiction in the Atlantic Ocean.

"Tidal epoch" means the variations in the major tide-producing forces that result from changes in the moon's phase, declination of the earth, distance of the moon from the earth, and regression of the moon's modes, and which go through one complete cycle in approximately 19 years.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-232

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1362, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 874, § 1/HB 402; Ga. L. 2019, p. 493, § 1/HB 445.)

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 3, 2019, for purposes of promulgating rules and regulations and for all other purposes effective December 30, 2019, substituted the present provisions of paragraph (8) for the former provisions, which read: " 'Dynamic dune field' means the dynamic area of beach and sand dunes, varying in height and width, the ocean boundary of which extends to the ordinary high-water mark and the landward boundary of which is the first occurrence either of live native trees 20 feet in height or greater or of a structure existing on July 1, 1979. The landward boundary of the dynamic dune field shall be the seaward most line connecting any such tree or structure as set forth in this part to any other such tree or structure if the distance between the two is a reasonable distance not to exceed 250 feet. In determining what is a reasonable distance for purposes of this paragraph, topography, dune stability, vegetation, lot configuration, existing structures, distance from the ordinary high-water mark, and other relevant information shall be taken into consideration in order to conserve the vital functions of the sand-sharing system. If a real estate appraiser certified pursuant to Chapter 39A of Title 43 determines that an existing structure, shoreline engineering activity, or other alteration which forms part of the landward boundary of the dynamic dune field has been more than 80 percent destroyed by storm driven water or erosion, the landward boundary of the dynamic dune field shall be determined as though such structure had not been in existence on July 1, 1979."; added paragraph (10.1); substituted the present provisions of paragraph (11) for the former provisions, which read: " 'Ordinary high-water mark' means the position along the shore of the mean monthly spring high tide reached during the most recent tidal epoch. This term is not synonymous with 'mean' high-water mark."; substituted "Reserved" for the former provisions of paragraph (13), which read: " 'Permit-issuing authority' means the Shore Protection Committee or a local unit of government which has adopted a program of shore protection which meets the standards of this part and which has been certified by the board as an approved program."; in paragraph (15), inserted "within the sand-sharing system" near the beginning, inserted ", tidal, or wave" and "or by beach nourishment or dune construction," near the middle, and inserted ", such as, but not limited to, sea oats (Uniola paniculate), beach morning glory (Ipomoea pes-caprae), and large salt meadow cordgrass (Spartina patens)," in the middle; and, in paragraph (18), inserted "not in the sand-sharing system" near the beginning, inserted "woody" in the middle, and added "such as, but not limited to, pines (Pinus), oaks (Quercus), and wax myrtles (Morella cerifera)" at the end.

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2019, p. 493,

§

10/HB 445, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval for the purposes of promulgating rules and regulations necessary to administer the provisions of this Act and shall become effective on December 31, 2019, for all other purposes." The Act was approved by the Governor on May 3, 2019.

Law reviews.

-
For survey article on environment, natural resources, and land use, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 145 (1982).

12-5-233. Area of operation of part.

The area of operation of this part shall be:

The dynamic dune fields on the barrier islands of this state as determined by reference to Code Section 12-5-232. Such determination shall be made by the committee on the basis of site inspection and evaluation of other pertinent information as provided for in subsection (d) of Code Section 12-5-239;

The submerged shoreline lands of this state from the seaward limit of this state's jurisdiction landward to the dynamic dune fields or to a line projected from the westernmost point of the dynamic dune field on the southern end of a barrier island, to the westernmost point of the dynamic dune field on the northern end of the adjacent barrier island to the south; and

If an area has dynamic dune fields as defined by Code Section

12-5-232

, and marshlands as defined by Code Section

12-5-282

, it is subject to the jurisdiction of this part and Part 4 of this article. In the event of a conflict between this part and Part 4 of this article, the commissioner shall determine which part shall apply so as to best protect the public interest.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-233

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1362, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 493, § 2/HB 445.)

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 3, 2019, for purposes of promulgating rules and regulations and for all other purposes effective December 30, 2019, substituted "committee" for "permit-issuing authority" in the middle of the second sentence of paragraph (1).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2019, p. 493,

§

10/HB 445, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval for the purposes of promulgating rules and regulations necessary to administer the provisions of this Act and shall become effective on December 31, 2019, for all other purposes." The Act was approved by the Governor on May 3, 2019.

Law reviews.

-
For survey article on environment, natural resources, and land use, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 145 (1982).

12-5-234. Powers and duties of department.

The department shall have the following authority:

To administer and enforce this part and all rules, regulations, and orders issued pursuant to this part;

To accept moneys from persons, government units, and private organizations;

To conduct public hearings and to institute and to prosecute court actions as may be necessary to enforce compliance with this part and any rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this part; provided, however, that all such actions shall be in the name of the department;

To make reasonable inspections of the lands within jurisdiction of this part to ascertain whether the requirements of this part and the rules, regulations, and permits promulgated or issued pursuant to this part are faithfully complied with;

To issue letters of permission and impose a reasonable fee for processing such letters of permission; and

To exercise all incidental powers necessary to carry out the purposes of this part.

The foregoing powers and duties may be exercised and performed by the department through such duly authorized agents and employees as it deems necessary and proper.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-234

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1362, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 874, § 2/HB 402.)

12-5-235. Shore Protection Committee.

There is created the Shore Protection Committee within the department. The committee shall be composed of five members, including the commissioner of natural resources and four people selected by the board. Each of three persons selected by the board shall be a resident of Camden, Glynn, McIntosh, Liberty, Bryan, or Chatham County. Three members of the committee shall constitute a quorum. The members of the committee shall be entitled to and shall be reimbursed from moneys appropriated to the department for their expenses, such as mileage and per diem, as set by the board.

The committee shall have the authority to issue orders and to grant, suspend, revoke, modify, extend, condition, or deny permits as provided in this part. Permits may, at the committee's discretion, be revoked, suspended, or modified upon a finding that the permittee is not in compliance with permit conditions or that the permittee is in violation of any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to this part.

The chairperson of the committee, upon application by the permittee, may issue renewal of a permit previously granted by the committee. Such action must be based upon recommendations of staff, past committee actions, and the results of public comments. The chairperson may refer the request for renewal to the committee to decide on renewals that, in his or her judgment, should receive broader consideration. A committee member may choose to have the full committee decide on renewals that the member feels should receive broader consideration.

Any permit for minor activity may be issued by the commissioner based on the recommendations of staff, past committee actions, and the results of public comments. The commissioner may refer the application to the committee to decide on permits for minor activities that, in his or her judgment, should receive broader consideration. A committee member may choose to have the full committee decide on permit applications for minor activities that the member feels should receive broader consideration.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-235

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1362, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 400, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 2-2/HB 252; Ga. L. 2019, p. 493, § 3/HB 445.)

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 3, 2019, for purposes of promulgating rules and regulations and for all other purposes effective December 30, 2019, in subsection (c), substituted "chairperson" for "chairman" in the first and third sentences, and inserted "or her" in the middle of the third sentence; and added subsection (d).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2019, p. 493,

§

10/HB 445, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval for the purposes of promulgating rules and regulations necessary to administer the provisions of this Act and shall become effective on December 31, 2019, for all other purposes." The Act was approved by the Governor on May 3, 2019.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Shore protection, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-2-2.

12-5-236. Rules and regulations.

The board shall have the power to promulgate rules and regulations for the implementation and enforcement of this part consistent with the purpose of this part.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-236

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1362, § 1.)

12-5-237. Permit required; exceptions.

No person shall construct or erect any structure or construct, erect, conduct, or engage in any shoreline engineering activity or engage in any land alteration which alters the natural topography or vegetation of any area within the jurisdiction of this part, except in accordance with the terms and conditions of a permit therefor issued in accordance with this part. A permit may authorize the construction or maintenance of the project proposed in an application. After construction of a project pursuant to a permit, the project may be maintained without an additional permit so long as it does not further alter the natural topography or vegetation of the site or increase the size or scope of the project, and remains in serviceable condition.

No permit shall be required for a structure, shoreline engineering activity, or land alteration which exists as of July 1, 1979, provided that a permit must be obtained for any modification which will have a greater adverse effect on the sand-sharing system or for any addition to or extension of such shoreline engineering activity, structure, or land alteration; provided, further, that, if any structure, shoreline engineering activity, or land alteration is more than 80 percent destroyed by wind, water, or erosion as determined by an appraisal of the fair market value by a real estate appraiser certified pursuant to Chapter 39A of Title 43, a permit is required for reconstruction.

No permit shall be required for any activity conducted pursuant to a letter of permission. At least 15 days prior to the commencement of any activity authorized pursuant to a letter of permission, the department shall provide public notice describing such activity and the location thereof; provided, however, that public notice shall not be required for any such activity that is necessary for public safety or the delivery of public services.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-237

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1362, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 874, § 3/HB 402.)

Cross references.

- Certification of professional engineers, T. 43, C. 15.

Law reviews.

-
For survey article on environment, natural resources, and land use, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 145 (1982).

12-5-238. Form and contents of application for permit.

All applications for permits required by this part must be on forms prescribed by the committee, must be properly executed, and must include the following:

The name and address of the applicant;

A brief description of the proposed project;

Construction documents showing the applicant's proposed project and the manner or method by which the project shall be accomplished. Such document shall identify the dynamic dune field affected;

A copy of the deed or other instrument under which the applicant claims title to the property or, if the applicant is not the owner, a copy of the deed or other instrument under which the owner claims the title together with written permission from the owner to carry out the project on the owner's land. In lieu of a deed or other instrument referred to in this paragraph, the committee may accept some other reasonable evidence of ownership of the property in question or other lawful authority to make use of the property. If all or any part of the proposed construction or alteration shall take place on property which is owned by the State of Georgia, the applicant shall present an easement, revocable license, or other written permission from the state to use the property for the proposed project; in the alternative, the committee may condition the issuance of the permit on the requirement to obtain written permission from the state. The committee will not adjudicate title disputes concerning the property which is the subject of the application; provided, however, that the committee may decline to process an application when submitted documents show conflicting deeds;

A plat showing the boundaries of the proposed project site;

The names and addresses of all landowners of property adjoining or abutting the parcel of land on which the proposed project is to be located. If the property to be altered is bordered on any side by other property of the applicant, the applicant shall supply the names and addresses of the nearest landowners, other than the applicant, of property adjoining the applicant's property. If the applicant cannot determine the identity of adjoining landowners or their addresses, the applicant shall file in lieu thereof an affidavit stating that a diligent search, including a search of the records of the county tax assessor's office, has been made but that the applicant was not able to ascertain the names or addresses of adjoining landowners;

A nonrefundable application fee to be set by the board in an amount necessary to defray the administrative cost of issuing such permit. Renewal fees shall be equal to application fees, which shall not exceed $1,000.00 for any one proposal and shall be paid to the department;

Site plans for the proposed project site showing existing and proposed streets, utilities, buildings, and any other physical structures;

A certification by a registered architect or engineer licensed by this state certifying that all proposed structures, if any, for which the permit is applied are designed to meet suitable hurricane-resistant standards;

Any and all other relevant data required by the committee for the purposes of ascertaining that the proposed improvements, activities, and uses will meet the standards of this part;

A certificate or letter from the local governing authority or authorities of the political subdivision in which the property is located stating that the applicant's proposal would not violate any zoning law; and

A statement from the applicant that he or she has made inquiry to the appropriate authorities that the proposed project is not over a landfill or hazardous waste site and that the site is otherwise suitable for the proposed project.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-238

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1362, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 493, § 4/HB 445.)

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 3, 2019, for purposes of promulgating rules and regulations and for all other purposes effective December 30, 2019, substituted "committee" for "permit-issuing authority" throughout this Code section; substituted "the owner's" for "his" near the end of the first sentence in paragraph (4); substituted the present provisions of paragraph (7) for the former provisions, which read: "An application fee in such reasonable amount as is designated by the permit-issuing authority or, if the committee is the permit-issuing authority, a nonrefundable application fee as set by the board which reflects the cost to the department to evaluate the application. Fees for the renewal of a permit shall be equal to the application fee. Application fees shall not exceed $1,000.00 for any one proposal. If the committee is the permit-issuing authority, such fees shall be paid to the department;"; substituted "would not violate" for "is not violative of" near the end of paragraph (11); and inserted "or she" near the middle of paragraph (12).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2019, p. 493

§

10/HB 445, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval for the purposes of promulgating rules and regulations necessary to administer the provisions of this Act and shall become effective on December 31, 2019, for all other purposes." The Act was approved by the Governor on May 3, 2019.